Oklahoma, session 2026, SB412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-110, is

amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 1389 Page 1

Section 5-110. A. A school district elector who is elected or

appointed to be a member of a school district board of education

prior to January 1, 2014, shall obtain instruction on education

issues in accordance with rules promulgated by the State Board of

Education. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, at

the time a school district elector files a notification and

declaration of candidacy for the office of school district board of

education membership or is appointed to be a member of a school

district board of education on or after January 1, 2014, the elector

shall agree and pledge in writing that, within fifteen (15) Within

six (6) months of election or appointment as a member of the

district board of education, the member will may complete at least

twelve (12) three (3) hours of instruction on education issues in

the following areas: school finance; legal issues, which include

but are not limited to employment, due process, new laws, the

Oklahoma Open Records Act and the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act; and

duties and responsibilities, which include but are not limited to

special education and ethics, of district board of education

members. Each elector shall agree and pledge in writing to complete

at least one (1) hour of instruction in school finance, one (1) hour

of instruction in the Oklahoma Open Records Act and the Oklahoma

Open Meeting Act, and one (1) hour of instruction in school law and

ethics. The remaining hours may be satisfied by attending a two-day

workshop to be held within the state Training shall be provided by

Req. No. 1389 Page 2

the State Department of Education, by and/or the Oklahoma Department

of Career and Technology Education, or by attending workshops,

seminars or classes which address the above-mentioned subject

matter, and which are sponsored by any organization approved by the

State Board of Education, including but not limited to institutions

of higher education. The State Board of Education shall promulgate

rules by which an organization or particular courses offered by an

organization may be approved for purposes of fulfilling the

instructional requirements set out in this section.

B. When an incumbent of a district board of education files a

notification and declaration of candidacy for reelection to the

district board of education, the member shall be required to agree

and pledge in writing that upon reelection the member will complete

six (6) hours of instruction, within fifteen (15) months of

election, including one (1) hour of instruction in school finance,

one (1) hour of instruction in the Oklahoma Open Records Act and the

Oklahoma Open Meeting Act and one (1) hour of instruction in ethics.

The remaining hours may be satisfied by attending a workshop, class

or seminar addressing the education issues set forth in subsection A

of this section. Each elected or appointed school district board of

education member shall represent the interests of his or her

constituents and hold the school district superintendent to the

same.



Req. No. 1389 Page 3

C. The State Department of Education shall, immediately after

the annual elections of various district board of education members,

determine the members of the district boards of education pledged to

complete the instructional requirements established in subsections A

and B of this section, and shall notify the members of the time and

place where training workshops, classes, and seminars are to be

conducted. Upon completion of the instructional requirements, the

certificate of completion shall be included in the public records of

the school board’s minutes. Each school board member, except for an

incumbent member, shall be required within fifteen (15) months

following or preceding election to complete the workshop established

by subsection A of this section or to attend twelve (12) hours of

other state workshops, classes or seminars conducted as instruction

on the subjects of school finance, legal issues, and the ethics,

duties and responsibilities of district board of education members,

including at least one (1) hour of instruction in school finance,

one (1) hour of instruction in the Oklahoma Open Records Act and the

Oklahoma Open Meeting Act and one (1) hour of instruction in ethics.

D. If a school board member, including an incumbent member, has

not satisfied the instructional requirements as set forth in this

section within fifteen (15) months of election, reelection or

appointment, the district board of education shall declare the seat

of the member vacant within sixty (60) days of the final date that

the member has to complete the requirements as indicated by receipt

Req. No. 1389 Page 4

of t he certified notice from the State Board of Education as

provided for pursuant to Section 5-110.2 of this title and shall

fill the vacancy according to law. A school board member who is

required to vacate a school board seat pursuant to this subsection

and Section 5-110.2 of this title shall be ineligible to be

reappointed to, to run for reelection to or to hold that respective

board seat on the school district board of education or to run for

election to or to hold any other board seat on the board of

education for a two-year period.

E. D. All government departments, agencies, and institutions of

this state are directed to lend assistance as may be required by the

State Department of Education for the proper conduct and

administration of the workshops as authorized in subsection A of

this section. The State Department of Education shall maintain a

permanent record of the instructional hours and continuing education

hours earned for each district board of education member.

F. E. The State Department of Education, and/or the Oklahoma

Department of Career and Technology Education, and, upon approval of

the State Board of Education, any organization or association

representing district boards of education in this state are

authorized to charge persons pledged to attend the school board

member’s district for attendance at a workshop, class, or seminar

for purposes of meeting the instructional requirements components of

this section, a registration fee sufficient to defray the estimated

Req. No. 1389 Page 5

cost s of presenting the workshop, class, or seminar and to collect

the fees at the time of registration completion of the workshop,

class, or seminar.

G. F. Any member of a district board of education or any

individual elected, certified as the elected member by the county

election board, but not sworn in and seated as a member of a

district board of education at the time of a workshop, class, or

seminar presented by the State Board Department of Education, and/or

the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education, or an

organization or association representing district boards of

education within the state who attends and successfully completes a

workshop, class, or seminar as required by pursuant to subsection A

or B of this section shall be reimbursed by the school district in

accordance with the travel reimbursement policy of the district.

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-110.2, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 5-110.2. The State Board of Education Each school

district shall maintain and post on its website records of

attendance by school board members at continuing education events

required pursuant to Sections the three (3) hours of training

described by subsection A of Section 5-110 and 5-110.1 of this

title. Prior to the final opportunity for each school board member

who has not completed the continuing education requirements to

complete the same, the Board shall notify the school board member

Req. No. 1389 Page 6

and the school district superintendent by mail before March 1 of

each year of any final opportunity to complete these requirements

and the consequences of not completing the requirements. Upon

determining that a school board member did not complete the

continuing education requirements of Sections 5-110 or 5-110.1

within the respective period of time, the Board shall immediately

notify by certified mail the school board member and the school

district superintendent and inform the member of the violation of

the continuing education requirements. The school board member

shall have sixty (60) days after the date of receipt of the

certified notice to complete the requirements. If the school board

member does not complete the requirements by the end of the sixty-

day time period, the school district board of education is required

to declare the seat of that member vacant.

SECTION 3. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-110.1, is

hereby repealed.

SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-1-1389 EB 1/14/2025 3:51:09 PM



Req. No. 1389 Page 7